Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Procedure for Exercise of Dissenters' Rights

48-23-201. Notice of dissenters' rights.

Where any corporate action specified in § 48-23-102(a) is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, the meeting notice (including any meeting notice required under chapters 11-27 to be provided to nonvoting shareholders) must state that the corporation has concluded that the shareholders are, are not, or may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights under this chapter. If the corporation concludes that dissenters' rights are or may be available, a copy of this chapter must accompany the meeting notice sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise dissenters' rights.

In a merger pursuant to § 48-21-105, the parent corporation must notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert dissenters rights that the corporate action became effective. Such notice must be sent within ten (10) days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in § 48-23-203.

Where any corporate action specified in § 48-23-102(a) is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to § 48-17-104(a) or § 48-17-104(b):

Written notice that dissenters' rights are, are not, or may be available must be sent to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that dissenters' rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this chapter; and

Written notice that dissenters' rights are, are not, or may be available must be delivered together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by § 48-17-104(e) and (f), may include the materials described in § 48-23-203 and, if the corporation has concluded that dissenters' rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

A corporation's failure to give notice pursuant to this section will not invalidate the corporate action.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.20; 2012, ch. 1051, § 45.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-811, 5-1108.

48-23-202. Notice of intent to demand payment.

If a corporate action specified in § 48-23-102(a) is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights with respect to shares for which dissenters' rights may be asserted under this chapter:

Must deliver to the corporation, before the vote is taken, written notice of the shareholder's intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Must not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any such shares in favor of the proposed action.

If a corporate action specified in § 48-23-102(a) is to be approved by less than unanimous written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights with respect to shares for which dissenters' rights may be asserted under this chapter must not sign a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to such shares.

A shareholder who fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or subsection (b) is not entitled to payment under this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.21; 2012, ch. 1051, § 46.

48-23-203. Dissenters' notice.

If a corporate action requiring dissenters' rights under § 48-23-102(a) becomes effective, the corporation must send a written dissenters' notice and form required by subdivision (b)(1) to all shareholders who satisfy the requirements of § 48-23-202(a) or § 48-23-202(b). In the case of a merger under § 48-21-105, the parent must deliver a dissenters' notice and form to all record shareholders who may be entitled to assert dissenters' rights.

The dissenters' notice must be delivered no earlier than the date the corporate action specified in § 48-23-102(a) became effective, and no later than (10) days after such date, and must:

Supply a form that:

Specifies the first date of any announcement to shareholders made prior to the date the corporate action became effective of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action;

If such announcement was made, requires the shareholder asserting dissenters' rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which dissenters' rights are asserted was acquired before that date; and

Requires the shareholder asserting dissenters' rights to certify that such shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction;

State:

Where the form must be sent and where certificates for certificated shares must be deposited and the date by which those certificates must be deposited, which date may not be earlier than the date for receiving the required form under subdivision (b)(2)(B);

A date by which the corporation must receive the form, which date may not be fewer than forty (40) nor more than sixty (60) days after the date the subsection (a) dissenters' notice is sent, and state that the shareholder shall have waived the right to demand payment with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by such specified date;

The corporation's estimate of the fair value of shares; and

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder so requesting, within ten (10) days after the date specified in subdivision (b)(2)(B) the number of shareholders who return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this chapter if the corporation has not previously sent a copy of this chapter to the shareholder pursuant to § 48-23-201.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.22; 2012, ch. 1051, § 47; 2015, ch. 60, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-812, 5-813.

48-23-204. Duty to demand payment.

A shareholder sent a dissenters' notice described in § 48-23-203 must demand payment, certify whether the shareholder acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the dissenters' notice pursuant to § 48-23-203(b)(2), and deposit the shareholder's certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice.

The shareholder who demands payment and deposits the shareholder's share certificates under subsection (a) retains all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are cancelled or modified by the effectuation of the proposed corporate action.

A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit the shareholder's share certificates where required, each by the date set in the dissenters' notice, is not entitled to payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter.

A demand for payment filed by a shareholder may not be withdrawn unless the corporation with which it was filed, or the surviving corporation, consents thereto.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.23; 2012, ch. 1051, § 48.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-813.

48-23-205. Share restrictions.

The corporation may restrict the transfer of uncertificated shares from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed corporate action is effectuated or the restrictions released under § 48-23-207.

The person for whom dissenters' rights are asserted as to uncertificated shares retains all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are cancelled or modified by the effectuation of the proposed corporate action.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.24.

48-23-206. Payment.

Except as provided in § 48-23-208, as soon as the proposed corporate action is effectuated, or upon receipt of a payment demand, whichever is later, the corporation shall pay each dissenter who complied with § 48-23-204 the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of each dissenter's shares, plus accrued interest.

The payment must be accompanied by:

The corporation's balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders' equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

A statement of the corporation's estimate of the fair value of the shares, which estimate shall equal or exceed the corporation's estimate given pursuant to § 48-23-203(b)(2)(C);

An explanation of how the interest was calculated;

A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 48-23-209; and

A copy of this chapter if the corporation has not previously sent a copy of this chapter to the shareholder pursuant to § 48-23-201 or § 48-23-203.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.25; 2015, ch. 60, § 4.

48-23-207. Failure to take action.

If the corporation does not effectuate the proposed action that gave rise to the dissenters' rights within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment and depositing share certificates, the corporation shall return the deposited certificates and release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares.

If, after returning deposited certificates and releasing transfer restrictions, the corporation effectuates the proposed action, it must send a new dissenters' notice under § 48-23-203 and repeat the payment demand procedure.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.26.

48-23-208. After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by § 48-23-206 from a dissenter unless the dissenter was the beneficial owner of the shares before the date set forth in the dissenters' notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action.

To the extent the corporation elects to withhold payment under subsection (a), after effectuating the proposed corporate action, it shall estimate the fair value of the shares, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of the dissenter's demand. The corporation shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate of the fair value of the shares, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment under § 48-23-209.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.27.

48-23-209. Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A dissenter may notify the corporation in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate (less any payment under § 48-23-206), or reject the corporation's offer under § 48-23-208 and demand payment of the fair value of the dissenter's shares and interest due, if:

The dissenter believes that the amount paid under § 48-23-206 or offered under § 48-23-208 is less than the fair value of the dissenter's shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

The corporation fails to make payment under § 48-23-206 within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment; or

The corporation, having failed to effectuate the proposed action, does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within two (2) months after the date set for demanding payment.

A dissenter waives the dissenter's right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the corporation of the dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (a) within one (1) month after the corporation made or offered payment for the dissenter's shares.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 13.28.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-302.